Georgia statutes. TITLE 52 Waters of the State, Ports, and Watercraft
CHAPTER 10 Foreign Trade Zones

Cross references.

Storage and distribution of alcoholic beverages by corporations granted privilege of establishing, operating, and maintaining foreign trade zones, §

3-3-30

.

52-10-1.
“Public corporation” defined.

As used in this chapter, “public corporation” means the State of Georgia or any political subdivision thereof, any public agency of this state or of any political subdivision thereof, or any public board, bureau, commission, or authority created by the General Assembly.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 40, § 2.

52-10-2.
Application by public corporation to establish and operate foreign trade zone.

Any public corporation of the State of Georgia, as that term is defined in Code Section 52-10-1, is authorized to make application for the privilege of establishing, operating, and maintaining a foreign trade zone in accordance with an act of Congress approved June 18, 1934, entitled “An Act to provide for the establishment, operation, and maintenance of foreign trade zones in ports of entry of the United States, to expedite and encourage foreign commerce, and for other purposes.”

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 40, § 1.

U.S. Code.

The Act providing for foreign-trade zones, referred to in this Code section, is codified as

19 U.S.C. § 81

a et seq.

52-10-3.
Application by private corporation to establish and operate foreign trade zone.

Any private corporation hereafter organized under the laws of this state for the purpose of establishing, operating, and maintaining a foreign trade zone in accordance with the act of Congress referred to in Code Section 52-10-2 is authorized to make application for the privilege of establishing, operating, and maintaining a foreign trade zone in accordance with the said act of Congress.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 40, § 3.

U.S. Code.

The Act providing for foreign-trade zones, referred to in this Code section, is codified as

19 U.S.C. § 81

a et seq.

Law reviews.

For article discussing advantages of foreign trade zones and limits of their availability, see 27 Mercer L. Rev. 629 (1976).

52-10-4.
Authority to establish and operate foreign trade zone; conditions and restrictions of act of Congress.

Any public or private corporation authorized by this chapter to make application for the privilege of establishing, operating, and maintaining a foreign trade zone, whose application is granted pursuant to the terms of the act of Congress referred to in Code Section 52-10-2, is authorized to establish such foreign trade zone and to operate and maintain it, subject to the conditions and restrictions of said act of Congress and any amendments thereto and under such rules and regulations and for the period of time that may be prescribed by the board established by such act of Congress to carry out the provisions of such act.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 40, § 4; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 52.

U.S. Code.

The Act providing for foreign-trade zones, referred to in this Code section, is codified as

19 U.S.C. § 81

a et seq.